Montana, session 2025, HB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-5-406, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-406. Immunization record. (1) The governing authority of each school shall require written
evidence of each pupil's student's immunization against the diseases listed in 20-5-403 and shall record the
immunization status, including any exemptions, of each pupil student as part of the pupil's student's permanent
school record.
(2) The governing authority shall conform with the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and its implementing regulations at 34 CFR, part 99.
(3) A student's personally identifiable health records, including information related to
immunizations received and immunization exemptions, are considered part of the student's education record
and are protected from disclosure as provided in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974.
(4) The governing authority of any school other than a postsecondary school shall file a written
report on immunizations and exemptions to immunizations under 20-5-405 for all students under its jurisdiction
with the department and the local health departmentat times and in the form prescribed by the department BY
DECEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR. The report may only include deidentified or aggregate information AND MUST
INCLUDE:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 364

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0364.2
(A) HOW MANY STUDENTS ARE ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL;
(B) THE NUMBER OF ENROLLED STUDENTS WITH VACCINE EXEMPTIONS;
(C) THE NUMBER OF FULLY VACCINATED STUDENTS; AND
(D) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WITH CONDITIONAL ENROLLMENT."

Section 2. Section 20-5-408, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-408. Enforcement. (1) The governing authority of any school other than a postsecondary
school shall prohibit from further attendance any pupil student allowed to attend conditionally who has failed to
obtain the immunizations required by 20-5-403(1) within time periods established by the department until that
pupil student has been immunized as required by the department or unless that pupil student has been
exempted under 20-5-405.
(2) The governing authority shall conform with the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and its implementing regulations at 34 CFR, part 99.
(3) A student's health records, including information related to immunizations received and
immunization exemptions, are considered part of the student's education record and are protected from
disclosure as provided in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 364